Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.615

Reinstatement.

(1) A domestic entity that is dissolved administratively under RCW 23.95.610 may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement not later than five years after the effective date of dissolution. The application must be executed by the entity and state:

(a) The name of the entity and a statement that the name satisfies RCW 23.95.300; if the name does not satisfy RCW 23.95.300, the entity must deliver with its application an amendment to its public organic record changing its name;

(b) The address of the principal office of the entity and the name and address of its registered agent;

(c) The effective date of the entity's administrative dissolution; and

(d) That the grounds for dissolution did not exist or have been cured.

(2) To be reinstated, an entity must pay the full amount of all annual license or renewal fees which would have been assessed during the period of administrative dissolution had the entity been in active status, plus a penalty fee established by the secretary of state by rule, and the license or renewal fee for the year of reinstatement.

(3) If the secretary of state determines that an application under subsection (1) of this section contains the information required by subsection (1) of this section, is satisfied that the information is correct, and determines that all payments required to be made to the secretary of state by subsection (2) of this section have been made, the secretary of state shall:

(a) Cancel the statement of administrative dissolution and prepare a statement of reinstatement that states the secretary of state's determination and the effective date of reinstatement;

(b) File the statement; and

(c) Serve a copy of the statement on the entity.

(4) When reinstatement under this section is effective as provided in RCW 23.95.210:

(a) It relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution; and

(b) The domestic entity resumes carrying on its activities and affairs as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred, except for the rights of a person arising out of an act or omission in reliance on the dissolution before the person knew or had reason to know of the reinstatement.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1604.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.